Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 REGISTRATION AND TAXATION
42-3-108. Determination of year model - tax lists.

All vehicles of the current year model, as designated by the manufacturer, shall, for the payment of the specific ownership tax, be considered in the first year of service regardless of the date of purchase, and those charged with the collection of annual specific ownership taxes on vehicles subject to specific ownership taxation shall use the year that the model was manufactured or constructed as the basis of computation of the annual specific ownership tax.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1093, § 2, effective August 8.

42-3-109. Tax for registration period.

Except as provided in sections 42-3-110, 42-3-304 (10), and 42-4-305 (5), the owner shall pay upon a purchased vehicle subject to registration under this article the prescribed fee for a twelve-month registration. In no event shall the specific ownership tax collected on any classified personal property be less than one dollar and fifty cents.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1093, § 2, effective August 8.

42-3-110. Payment of motor vehicle registration fees and specific ownership taxes in installments.

An owner of a motor vehicle, other than a trailer or semitrailer, classified as Class A or Class B personal property under section 42-3-106 (2)(b) may apply to the department to pay the twelve-month registration fee and specific ownership tax for the owner's fleet of such vehicles in installments. The department shall approve an application from a fleet owner to make payments for a fleet in installments if all the following requirements are met:

The total of the twelve-month registration fee and the twelve-month specific ownership tax for the fleet equals one thousand dollars or more;

The applicant pays one-third of the total amount due for registration and specific ownership tax with the application;

The fleet owner does not owe past due motor vehicle registration fees or specific ownership taxes or outstanding penalties imposed for nonpayment of such fees or taxes;

The owner is not denied the privilege of paying in installments pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section; and

The fleet owner has a performance bond issued by a surety company authorized to do business in Colorado, a bank letter of credit, or a certificate of deposit in an amount equal to no less than the remaining amount of the annual registration fee and specific ownership tax that will be paid in installments. The performance bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit shall be payable to the department if the owner fails to pay the required installments.

If an application to pay in installments is approved pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the applicant shall pay the remainder of the registration fee and specific ownership tax in two equal installments as follows:

The first installment on or before the first day of the fifth month of the registration period; and

The second installment on or before the first day of the ninth month of the registration period.

If a fleet owner fails to pay an installment under this section on or before the date the installment was due, the remaining amount of the unpaid registration fee and specific ownership tax for the fleet is due in full immediately. Such owner shall not operate the vehicles in such fleet on the highways of the state until the owner has paid such amount.

If a fleet owner fails to pay an installment for a motor vehicle under this section within thirty days after the installment was due, the department may deny such owner the privilege of paying registration fees and specific ownership taxes in installments under this section.

The provisions of this section do not modify the amount of the registration fee or specific ownership tax owed by an owner for a motor vehicle during a registration period.

The department may promulgate rules to implement the installment payment process established by this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1093, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-109.5 as it existed prior to 2005, and the former § 42-3-110 was relocated to § 42-3-111.

42-3-111. Tax year - disposition.

The annual specific ownership tax shall attach and apply to motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, or trailer coaches operated upon the highways of this state for the registration period within which it is levied and collected.

Payment of an annual specific ownership tax on a trailer coach to the authorized agent of a county of this state in which the situs of the trailer coach is established at the time of registration for all of a registration period shall constitute the entire tax payable on such vehicle.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1094, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-110 as it existed prior to 2005, and the former § 42-3-111 was relocated to § 42-3-112.

42-3-112. Failure to pay tax - penalty - rules.

If a vehicle subject to taxation under this article is not registered when required by law, the vehicle owner shall pay a late fee of twenty-five dollars for each month or portion of a month following the expiration of the registration period, or, if applicable, the expiration of the grace period described in section 42-3-114 for which the vehicle is unregistered; except that the amount of the late fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars. The late fee shall be due when the vehicle is registered.

(1.5) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the executive director of the department shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., that establish circumstances in addition to the circumstances described in subsection (3) of this section in which a vehicle owner shall be exempted from paying the late fee described in said subsection (1). The rules shall apply uniformly throughout the state and shall include, but shall not be limited to, exemptions for:

Acts of God and weather-related delays;

Office closures and furloughs;

Temporary registration number plates, tags, or certificates that have expired;

Medical hardships; and

Information technology failures.

The executive director of the department shall also promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., that allow the department or an authorized agent to reduce or waive the late fee that would otherwise be due upon the registration of a trailer that is a commercial or farm vehicle, as part of the normal operation, if the owner can establish, in accordance with criteria specified in the rules, that the trailer was idled so that it was not operated on any public highway in this state for at least a full registration period. Nothing in this paragraph (b) shall be construed to exempt the owner of an idled trailer from paying any fees imposed pursuant to this article other than the late fee before again operating the trailer on a public highway in this state or from paying any taxes imposed pursuant to this article. The owner shall provide to the department or authorized agent a sworn affidavit that states that the trailer has not been operated on the public highways during the period for which it was not registered as required and describes the nature of the business conditions that resulted in the removal of the trailer from service.

The executive director of the department shall consult with the authorized agents in promulgating the rules required by subsection (1.5)(a) of this section.

(1.7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, on and after July 1, 2010, the amount of the late fee payable by the owner of a vehicle without motive power that weighs sixteen thousand pounds or less or a camper trailer or a multipurpose trailer regardless of its weight, that is subject to taxation under this article, and that is not registered when required by law shall be ten dollars. For purposes of this subsection (1.7), the weight of a trailer of any kind is the empty weight.

Ten dollars of the late registration fee shall be retained by the department or the authorized agent who registers the motor vehicle. Each authorized agent shall remit to the department no less frequently than once a month, but otherwise at the time and in the manner required by the executive director of the department, the remainder of the late registration fees collected by the authorized agent. The executive director shall forward all late registration fees remitted by authorized agents plus the remainder of the late registration fees collected directly by the department to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the highway users tax fund in accordance with section 43-4-804 (1)(e), C.R.S.

The late fee described in subsection (1) of this section shall not be imposed on a vehicle subject to taxation under this article if:

The person who owns the vehicle uses the vehicle in operating a commercial business and, as part of the normal operation of the business, idles the vehicle so that it is not operated on any public highway in this state for at least one full registration period. Nothing in this paragraph (a) shall be construed to exempt the owner of an idled vehicle from paying any fees imposed pursuant to this article other than the late fee before again operating the vehicle on a public highway in this state or from paying any taxes imposed pursuant to this article.

The person who owns the vehicle is in the active military service of the United States and is serving outside the state when a registration period and grace period for renewal of registration for the vehicle end and the vehicle is not operated on any public highway of the state between the time the registration period and grace period end and the time the vehicle is reregistered. Nothing in this paragraph (b) shall be construed to exempt the owner of such a vehicle from paying any fees imposed pursuant to this article other than the late fee before again operating the vehicle on a public highway in this state or from paying any taxes imposed pursuant to this article.

The vehicle registration expired during the period the vehicle was reported stolen.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 395, § 1, effective July 1; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1094, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 50, § 7, effective March 2; (3)(c) added, (HB 09-1230), ch. 232, p. 1068, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1.5) added, (HB 10-1212), ch. 126, p. 419, § 1, effective April 15; (1.7) added, (HB 10-1211), ch. 323, p. 1500, § 1, effective July 1; (1.7) amended, (SB 10-198), ch. 377, p. 1771, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1.5)(c) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 367, § 13, effective August 9.

42-3-113. Records of application and registration - definitions.

The department shall file each application received and, when satisfied that the applicant is entitled to register the vehicle, shall register the vehicle and its owner as follows:

The owner and vehicle are assigned a distinct registration number, referred to in this article as the "registration number". Each registration number assigned to a vehicle and its owner is designated "urban" if the owner resides within the limits of a city or incorporated town. Each registration number assigned to a vehicle and its owner is designated "rural" if the owner resides outside the limits of a city or incorporated town. The authorized agent of each county shall certify to the department as soon as possible after the end of the calendar year, but not later than May 1 of the following year, the total number of vehicles classified as "urban" and the total number of vehicles classified as "rural".

The registration shall be filed alphabetically under the name of the owner.

The registration shall be filed numerically and alphabetically under the identification number and name of the vehicle.

Except as provided in subsection (2.5) of this section, the department, upon registering a vehicle, shall issue to the owner two registration cards, each of which contains upon its face the following:

The date issued;

The registration number assigned to the owner and vehicle;

The name and address of the owner;

A notice, in type that is larger than the other information contained on the registration card:

That motor vehicle insurance coverage is compulsory in Colorado;

That noncompliance is a misdemeanor traffic offense;

to (V) Repealed.

A notice containing the minimum and maximum penalties for failing to have motor vehicle insurance coverage under section 42-4-1409;

A notice that Colorado law provides for a one-month grace period after a registration is due for renewal;

A description of the registered vehicle, including the identification number;

If it was a new vehicle sold in this state after January 1, 1932, the date of sale by the manufacturer or dealer to the person first operating such vehicle; and

Such other statements of fact as may be determined by the department, but not the owner's signature.

(2.5) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the department shall print one registration card without the owner's address and issue the card to the owner; except that, if the motor vehicle is a commercial vehicle, the department shall print both registration cards issued to the owner with the owner's address. The department shall print the following statement on each registration card that is printed without an address:

A notice for renewal of registration shall include a notice, in type that is larger than the other information contained in the notice, that specifies that motor vehicle insurance coverage is compulsory in Colorado, that noncompliance is a misdemeanor traffic offense, that the minimum penalty for such offense is a five-hundred-dollar fine, and that the maximum penalty for such offense is one year's imprisonment and a one-thousand-dollar fine.

The department shall notify all registered owners of the provisions and requirements of subsection (2) and (3) of this section.

The department shall not require the owner to sign the registration card.

The registration card issued for a vehicle required to be registered under this article shall, at all times while the vehicle is being operated upon a highway, be in the possession of the driver or carried in the vehicle and subject to inspection by any peace officer.

Within thirty days after moving from an address listed upon a vehicle registration, a person shall notify the county of residence in which the vehicle is to be registered.

As used in this subsection (8):

"Eligible vehicle" means a motor vehicle that has a valid certificate of registration issued by the department of revenue to a person whose address of record is within the boundaries of the program area, as defined in section 42-4-304 (20). The term "eligible vehicle" does not include motor vehicles held for lease or rental to the general public, motor vehicles held for sale by motor vehicle dealers, including demonstration vehicles, motor vehicles used for motor vehicle manufacturer product evaluations or tests, law enforcement and other emergency vehicles, or nonroad vehicles, including farm and construction vehicles.

"Program area fleet" means a person who owns ten or more eligible vehicles. In determining the number of vehicles owned or operated by a person for purposes of this subsection (8), all motor vehicles owned, operated, leased, or otherwise controlled by such person shall be treated as owned by such person.

Upon the registration of an eligible vehicle, the owner shall report on forms provided by the department:

The types of fuel used by such vehicle; and

Whether such vehicle is dual-fueled or dedicated to one fuel.

The forms provided by the department shall include spaces for the following fuels: Gasoline, diesel, propane, electricity, natural gas, methanol or M85, ethanol or E85, biodiesel, and other.

Upon registration of a vehicle that is a part of a program area fleet, the owner shall report on forms provided by the department that such vehicle is owned by a program area fleet and shall list the owner's tax identification number.

Within a reasonable period of time and upon the request of a political subdivision or the state of Colorado or any institution of the state or the state's political subdivisions, the department shall provide a report listing the owners of eligible vehicles that use fuels other than gasoline or diesel, listing the fuel type of each such eligible vehicle, and identifying whether or not such eligible vehicles are part of a program area fleet.

Except for vehicles owned by a trust created for the benefit of a person with a disability, for purposes of enforcing disabled parking privileges granted pursuant to section 42-4-1208, the department, when issuing a registration card under this section, shall clearly indicate on the card if an owner of a vehicle is a person with a disability as defined in section 42-3-204. If the vehicle is owned by more than one person and the registration reflects that joint ownership, the department shall clearly indicate on the registration card which of the owners are persons with disabilities and which of the owners are not.

Whenever a person asks the department or any other state department or agency for the name or address of the owner of a motor vehicle registered under this section, the department or agency shall require the person to disclose if the purpose of the request is to determine the name or address of a person suspected of a violation of a state or municipal law detected through the use of an automated vehicle identification system as described in section 42-4-110.5. If the purpose of the request is to determine the name or address of such a suspect, the department or agency shall release such information only if the county or municipality for which the request is made complies with section 42-4-110.5.

No person who receives the name or address of the registered owner of a motor vehicle from the department or from a person who receives the information from the department shall release such information to a county or a municipality unless the county or municipality complies with state laws concerning the use of automated identification devices.

The department shall not place an expiration date on the registration card for a Class A commercial trailer or semitrailer registered in Colorado.

Thieves have been known to use the address from a registration card to steal from the vehicle's owner. For added security, you are encouraged to keep only this registration card in your vehicle. It does not contain your address.

Source:

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 395, § 2, effective July 1; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1095, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(7) amended, (HB 10-1045), ch. 317, p. 1480, § 5, effective July 1, 2011.

L. 2012:

(11) added, (HB 12-1038), ch. 276, p. 1456, § 4, effective June 8.

L. 2013:

(2)(d)(III) and (2)(d)(IV) repealed, (2)(d.5) added, and (2)(e) and (3) amended, (SB 13-081), ch. 114, p. 389, § 1, effective April 8.

L. 2014:

IP(2), (2)(h), (5), (7), and (8)(a)(I) amended, (2)(d)(V) repealed, and (2.5) added, (SB 14-131), ch. 388, p. 1942, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 368, § 14, effective August 9.

42-3-113.5. Electronic vehicle registration and titling - electronic transmission of vehicle lien information - authority - rules - cash fund - gifts, grants, and donations - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1289), ch. 380, p. 2224, § 3, effective June 5; (1), (2)(a), and (2)(c) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2396, § 41, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(2)(b) repealed, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1276, § 47, effective May 31.

L. 2018:

(3) added by revision, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, pp. 1811, 1815, §§ 5, 15.

42-3-114. Expiration.

Every vehicle registration under this article shall expire on the last day of the month at the end of each twelve-month registration period and shall be renewed, upon application by the owner, the payment of the fees required by law, and in accordance with section 42-3-113 (3), not later than the last day of the month following the date of expiration. No license plates other than those of the registration period to which they pertain shall be displayed on a motor vehicle operated on the highways of Colorado. A person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1098, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-124 as it existed prior to 2005, and the former § 42-3-114 was relocated to § 42-3-211.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class B traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-3-115. Registration upon transfer.

Repealed.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the transferee, before operating or permitting the operation of a motor vehicle upon a highway, shall register the vehicle.

A transferee may operate a motor vehicle on the highway before registering it if:

The vehicle is exempt from registration pursuant to section 42-3-103 or 42-3-104; or

The vehicle has been temporarily registered pursuant to section 42-3-203 (3); or

The transferee has purchased the motor vehicle within the last thirty-six hours from a person who is not a motor vehicle dealer under part 1 of article 20 of title 44;

The vehicle was purchased either on a Saturday, on a Sunday, on a legal holiday, or between 5 p.m. and 8 a.m.;

The vehicle is being driven from the place where the transferor stored the vehicle to the place where the transferee intends to store the vehicle;

The owner possesses, in the vehicle, a bill of sale that shows the time and date of sale and that is signed by both the buyer and seller; and

The owner possesses, in the vehicle, proof of insurance as required by section 42-4-1409.

If a title to or interest in a motor vehicle is transferred by operation of law, as upon inheritance, devise, or bequest, order in bankruptcy of insolvency, execution, sale, repossession upon default in performing the terms of a lease or executory sales contract, chattel mortgage, secured transaction, or otherwise, the registration thereof shall expire, and the vehicle shall not be operated upon the highways unless the vehicle is registered; except that a person repossessing the vehicle pursuant to rights granted by a mortgage or applicable law may operate the vehicle upon the highways from the place of repossession to the vehicle's new place of storage, either upon displaying upon such vehicle the number plates issued to the former owner or without displaying number plates but under a written permit obtained from the department or the police authorities with jurisdiction over such highways and upon displaying upon such vehicle a placard bearing the name and address of the person authorizing and directing such movement, plainly readable from a distance of one hundred feet during daylight.

The owner of a motor vehicle who has made a bona fide sale or transfer of such owner's title or interest and who has delivered possession of such vehicle and the certificate of title, properly endorsed, to the purchaser or transferee shall not be liable for any damages thereafter resulting from negligent operation of such vehicle by another.

Source:

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 800, § 1, effective July 1; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1098, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(2)(b)(II) amended, p. 1510, § 68, effective June 1.

L. 2017:

(2)(b)(III)(A) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2065, § 49, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(2)(b)(III)(A) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 141, § 15, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1) repealed, (HB 19-1138), ch. 231, p. 2319, § 2, effective January 1, 2020.

42-3-116. Manufacturers or dealers - definition.

Upon application using the proper form and payment of the fees required by law, a manufacturer of, drive-away or tow-away transporter of, or dealer in, motor vehicles, trailers, special mobile machinery, or semitrailers operating such vehicle upon any highway, in lieu of registering each vehicle, may obtain from the department and attach to each such vehicle one number plate, as required in this article for different classes of vehicles. Such plate shall bear a distinctive number; the name of this state, which may be abbreviated; the year issued; and a distinguishing word or symbol indicating that such plate was issued to a manufacturer, drive-away or tow-away transporter, or dealer. Such plates may, during the registration period for which they were issued, be transferred from one such vehicle to another when owned and operated by or with the authority of such manufacturer or representative of such manufacturer or operated by such drive-away or tow-away transporter or dealer.

No manufacturer of or dealer in motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers shall cause or permit a vehicle owned by such person to be operated or moved upon a public highway without displaying upon such vehicle a number plate, except as otherwise authorized in this article.

A manufacturer of motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers may operate or move upon the highways any such vehicle from the factory where manufactured to a railway depot, vessel, or place of shipment or delivery, without registering the same and without an attached number plate, under a written permit first obtained from the police authorities with jurisdiction over such highways and upon displaying upon each such vehicle a placard bearing the name and address of the manufacturer authorizing or directing such movement, plainly readable from one hundred feet away during daylight.

Any dealer in motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers may operate, move, or transport a vehicle owned by such dealer on the streets and highways of this state without registering such vehicle and without an attached numbered plate if there is displayed on such vehicle a depot tag issued by the department. Such tag may be purchased from the department for a fee of five dollars. Such tags shall only be used for moving authorized vehicles for purposes of testing, repairs, or transporting them from the point of delivery to the dealer's place of business and for similar legitimate business purposes; but nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the use of such tag for private purposes.

The executive director of the department shall promulgate rules for the use of depot tags and dealer plates, and a violation of such rules shall subject the violator to a suspension or revocation of the violator's depot tag and dealer plates after a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

A manufacturer or dealer, upon transferring a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, whether by sale, lease, or otherwise, to any person other than a manufacturer or dealer shall immediately give written notice of such transfer to the department upon the form provided by the department. Such notice shall contain the date of such transfer, the names and addresses of the transferor and transferee, and such description of the vehicle as may be required by the department.

An application for a full-use dealer plate may be submitted by a motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler who:
(6) (a) (I) An application for a full-use dealer plate may be submitted by a motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler who:

Has sold more than twenty-five motor vehicles in the twelve-month period preceding application;

Purchases an existing motor vehicle dealership or wholesale business that has sold more than twenty-five vehicles during the twelve-month period preceding application; or

Obtains a license to operate a new or used motor vehicle dealership or wholesale business with an inventory of fifty or more motor vehicles.

Full-use dealer plates may be used in lieu of, in the same manner as, and to the same extent as number plates issued pursuant to section 42-3-201.

The department shall issue full-use dealer plates upon payment of the fee specified in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b) and upon application of a motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler accompanied by satisfactory evidence that the applicant is entitled to the plate in accordance with the criteria established in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (6).

The annual fee for full-use dealer plates shall be established and adjusted annually by the department based on the average of specific ownership taxes and registration fees paid for passenger vehicles and light-duty trucks that are seven model years old or newer and that were registered during the one-year period preceding January 1 of each year. Such annual fee shall be prorated on a monthly basis. The annual fee for full-use dealer plates for motorcycles shall be established and adjusted annually by the department based on the average of specific ownership taxes and registration fees paid for motorcycles that are seven model years old or newer and that were registered during the one-year period preceding January 1 of each year. Such annual fee for motorcycles shall be prorated on a monthly basis.

Full-use dealer plates shall be valid for a period not to exceed one year.

Each full-use dealer plate shall be returned to the department within ten days after the sale or closure of a motor vehicle dealership or wholesale business listed in an application submitted pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b).

Full-use dealer plates may be used only for vehicles owned and offered for sale by the dealer or wholesaler. Full-use dealer plates shall not be used on vehicles owned by dealerships or wholesalers that are commonly used by that dealer as tow trucks or vehicles commonly used by that dealer to pick up or deliver parts. At the dealer's or wholesaler's discretion, the full-use plate may be transferred from one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle. The dealer or wholesaler shall not be required to report any such transfer to the department.

A motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler may assign a full-use dealer plate only to the following persons:

Owners or co-owners of the licensed dealership or wholesale motor vehicle business;

An employee of the motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler;

To any person, including former, current, and prospective customers, in order to serve the legitimate business interest of the motor vehicle dealership or motor vehicle wholesale business; and

A spouse or dependent child living in the same household as the licensed dealer or wholesaler.

As used in this subsection (6), "motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler" includes motor vehicle dealers, used motor vehicle dealers, and wholesalers as those terms are defined in section 44-20-102.

A person who sells special mobile machinery in the ordinary course of business may submit an application for a demonstration plate.

The department shall issue a demonstration plate upon payment of the fee specified in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b) and upon application of a motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler accompanied by satisfactory evidence that the applicant is entitled to the plate in accordance with this subsection (7).

The department shall establish and adjust the annual fee for a demonstration plate based on the average of specific ownership taxes and registration fees paid for items of special mobile machinery that are seven model years old or newer during the previous year.

A demonstration plate shall be valid for one year.

The owner of a demonstration plate shall return the plate to the department within ten days after the sale or closure of the business that sells special mobile machinery in the ordinary course of business.

No person shall operate special mobile machinery with a demonstration plate unless the machinery is offered for sale and being demonstrated for the purposes of a sale. The owner may transfer the plate from one item of special mobile machinery to another and without reporting the transfer to the department.

A person who violates this subsection (7) commits a class 2 misdemeanor, and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1099, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(4)(a) amended, p. 30, § 5, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(7) added, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1490, § 7, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

(7)(d) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1181, § 107, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(6)(e) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2065, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(6)(e) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 141, § 16, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-127 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-117. Nonresidents.

A nonresident owner, except as otherwise provided in this section, owning a foreign motor vehicle may operate or permit such vehicle to operate within this state without registering such vehicle or paying fees so long as the vehicle is currently registered in the state, country, or other place of which the owner is a resident, and the motor vehicle displays the number plate or plates issued for such vehicle in the place of residence of such owner.

An owner or operator of a foreign vehicle operated within this state for the transportation of persons or property for compensation or for the transportation of merchandise shall register such vehicle and pay the same fees as required for similar vehicles owned by residents of this state; except that a motor vehicle, truck, semitractor, truck tractor, bus, trailer, or semitrailer registered in a foreign state or country that has a registration reciprocity agreement with Colorado shall be registered in accordance with such agreement.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1101, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-128 as it existed prior to 2005, and portions of the former § 42-3-117 were relocated to § 42-3-218.

42-3-118. Registration suspended upon theft - recovery - rules.

Repealed.

After receiving an application for a motor vehicle registration, the department or its authorized agent shall electronically verify with the department of public safety that the motor vehicle has not been reported stolen. The department or its authorized agent shall not register a motor vehicle reported stolen in the system until the vehicle is recovered by the owner. The department shall promulgate rules setting forth procedures to notify the local law enforcement agency upon discovery that a person is attempting to register a stolen motor vehicle.

This subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2009.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1102, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1024, § 1, effective August 5.

42-3-119. No application for registration granted - when.

The department shall not grant an application for the registration of a vehicle in any of the following events:

When the applicant for registration is not entitled thereto under this article;

When the applicant has neglected or refused to furnish the department with the information required on the appropriate official form or reasonable additional information required by the department;

When the registration fees required by law have not been paid;

When a certification of emissions control is required pursuant to part 4 of article 4 of this title, and such certification has not been obtained.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1102, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-131 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-120. Department may cancel or deny registration.

The department shall cancel the registration of any vehicle that the department determines is unsafe or unfit to be operated or is not equipped as required by law.

The department shall cancel the registration of a vehicle whenever the person to whom registration number plates have been issued unlawfully uses or permits the unlawful use of the same.

Upon receiving written notice from the Colorado state patrol that a motor carrier has failed to timely pay civil penalties imposed in accordance with section 42-4-235 (2), the department shall cancel the registration of any vehicle that is owned by the carrier and shall deny the registration of any vehicle that is owned by the carrier until the department receives notice from the Colorado state patrol that the penalty has been paid in full.

Repealed.

Upon receiving written notice from the public utilities commission that a person has failed to timely pay civil penalties imposed in accordance with section 40-7-113, the department shall cancel the registration of any vehicle that is owned by the person for which the penalty was assessed and shall deny the registration of any such vehicle until the department receives written notice from the public utilities commission that the penalty has been paid in full.

On or after August 10, 2011, this subsection (4) applies to all vehicles regardless of when the vehicles were purchased.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1102, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(3) added, p. 857, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(4) added, (HB 09-1230), ch. 232, p. 1068, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(3)(a) and (4) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 424, § 22, effective August 10.